District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.95

Short title.

This part may be cited as the “Captive Insurance Agency Establishment Act of 2008”.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-196, § 16a
as added Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1032(i), 60 DCR 12472
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added this section.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1032(i) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1032(i) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.